New York, session 2025-2026, S10284.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Fashion 2 Design Professional Standards and Certification Act". 3 § 2. The education law is amended by adding a new article 169 to read 4 as follows: 5 ARTICLE 169 6 FASHION DESIGN 7 Section 8890. Definitions. 8 8891. State board for fashion design. 9 8892. Certification and licensure structure. 10 8893. Continuing education. 11 8894. Limitations and construction. 12 § 8890. Definitions. As used in this section: 13 1. "fashion designer" means any individual engaged in the design, 14 development, or production of apparel, accessories, or related products. 15 2. "certification" means a voluntary credential recognizing demon- 16 strated competency in fashion design, including technical, safety, and 17 professional standards. 18 3. "licensure" means an optional state-recognized designation permit- 19 ting the use of the title "licensed fashion designer". 20 4. "board" means the New York state board for fashion design estab- 21 lished pursuant to this article. 22 § 8891. State board for fashion design. 1. There is hereby established 23 a state board for fashion design, the members of which shall be 24 appointed by the board of regents on recommendation of the commissioner 25 for the purpose of assisting the board of regents and the department on EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15781-01-6 S. 10284 2 1 matters of professional licensing and professional conduct in accordance 2 with section sixty-five hundred eight of this title. An executive secre- 3 tary to the board shall be appointed by the board of regents on recom- 4 mendation of the commissioner and shall be a fashion designer licensed 5 in this state. 6 2. The board shall be composed of not less than seven fashion design- 7 ers. At least four of these seven members shall be owners or employees 8 of a small business, as defined in section one hundred thirty-one of the 9 economic development law, or freelance workers, as defined in section 10 fourteen hundred ten of the general business law. 11 3. The board shall have the following powers and duties to provide 12 assistance to the department: 13 (a) establish a voluntary certification and licensing framework for 14 fashion designers. 15 (b) develop and administer standards for certification, licensure, and 16 continuing education. 17 (c) ensure that participation in certification or licensure programs 18 shall be strictly voluntary and shall not be required for employment in 19 the fashion industry. 20 (d) maintain a public registry of individuals who hold valid certif- 21 ication or licensure under this article. 22 (e) promulgate any rules and regulations necessary to implement this 23 article. 24 4. The board may utilize existing resources and establish reasonable 25 fees to administer certification and licensure programs. 26 § 8892. Certification and licensure structure. 1. The board shall 27 establish tiered certification levels, including: 28 (a) a general certification for entry and mid-level designers; 29 (b) specialized certifications for category-specific expertise; and 30 (c) an optional state license for qualified individuals meeting 31 advanced experience requirements. 32 2. Certification shall be based on a combination of education, work 33 experience, and successful completion of an approved examination. 34 3. The board may approve or recognize independent accrediting bodies 35 to establish educational and training standards. 36 § 8893. Continuing education. The board shall establish continuing 37 education requirements for certified and licensed individuals. Such 38 requirements shall include, but not be limited to, instruction in emerg- 39 ing technologies, sustainability, product safety, and professional 40 ethics. Continuing education may be satisfied through approved courses 41 or employer sponsored programs. 42 § 8894. Limitations and construction. Nothing in this article shall be 43 construed to: 44 (a) require any individual to obtain certification or licensure to 45 practice fashion design. 46 (b) restrict freelance, artistic, or small business practices. 47 (c) create a private right of action against fashion designers based 48 solely on certification status. 49 § 3. The state finance law is amended by adding a new section 136-e to 50 read as follows: 51 § 136-e. Contracts involving fashion design. For contracts involving 52 fashion design products or services, contracting entities may require or 53 give preference to fashion designers holding certification or licensure 54 issued pursuant to article one hundred sixty-nine of the education law. 55 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately.